District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.20

Exemptions.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 320, 32 DCR 7396
as added Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(q), 44 DCR 1423
Feb. 27, 1998, D.C. Law 12-50,§ 2(a), 44 DCR 6222
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-82, § 2(c), 45 DCR 772
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 13(b), 46 DCR 2111
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 9, 46 DCR 2118
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 29(b), 47 DCR 1325
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 3(c), 48 DCR 2043
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(d), 48 DCR 4047
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1507(b), 48 DCR 6981
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(b), 48 DCR 7674
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 22(b), 51 DCR 881
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-342, § 301, 52 DCR 2346
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 118, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-197, § 3, 53 DCR 8827
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1002(b), 54 DCR 4102
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-173, § 2(b), 55 DCR 5383
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 142, 203(d), 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, §§ 1313, 2082(d), 4042, 57 DCR 181
Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-286, § 3, 57 DCR 11012
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.20.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-17, July 17, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 6314).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(b) of the Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 58 DCR 10807).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Contract No. DCFRA 00-C-030B, (Capital Improvements and Renovations to Various Metropolitan Police Department Facilities) Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-200, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10018).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Solid Waste Transfer Station Service and Settlement Agreements Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-229, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2742).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Contract No. DCFJ-2004-B-0031 (Delivery of Electrical Power and Ancillary Services) Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-231, on March 16, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 3557).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Oak Hill Construction Streamlining Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-136, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5764).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Procurement of Natural Gas and Electricity Exemption Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-174, November 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 9641).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the DCPL Procurement Temporary Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-45, September 11, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 7766).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Boys and Girls Club of Greater Washington Property Acquisition Temporary Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-58, October 3, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 8225).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the University of the District of Columbia Procurement Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-92, December 17, 2009, law notification 57 DCR 1164).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum and Contracting Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-282, March 8, 2011, law notification 58 DCR 2898).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the District of Columbia Public Service Commission Independent Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-438, August 18, 1998, 45 DCR 6291).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Photo Enforcement Evidenced Traffic Violation System Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-516, December 9, 1998, 45 DCR 9177).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-38, March 22, 1999, 46 DCR 3015).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public Service Commission Independent Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-52, April 6, 1999, 46 DCR 3638).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Contract No. GF98102 (University Bookstore Operation and Management) Emergency Exemption Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-103, July 9, 1999, 46 DCR 6020).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Chief Technology Officer Year 2000 Remediation Procurement Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-106, July 9, 1999, 46 DCR 6028).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 to 4 of the Southeast Tennis and Learning Center Construction Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-183, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9742).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 28(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 28(b) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(b) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(b) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1407(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(b) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Contract No. DCFRA 00-C-030B (Capital Improvements and Renovations to Various Metropolitan Police Department Facilities) Exemption Holiday Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-392, June 24, 2002, 49 DCR 6089).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Solid Waste Transfer Station Service and Settlement Agreements Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-426, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7631).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Contract No. DCFRA 00-C-030B (Capital Improvements and Renovations to Various Metropolitan Police Department Facilities) Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-475, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9566).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Solid Waste Transfer Station Service and Settlement Agreements Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-506, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10215).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Contract DCFJ-2004-B-0031 (Delivery of Electric Power and Ancillary Services) Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-617, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11447).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 301 of Omnibus Utility Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-12, January 28, 2005, 52 DCR 2945).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Oak Hill Construction Streamlining Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-332, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2594).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement of Natural Gas and Electricity Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-410, July 12, 2006, 53 DCR 5769).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Library Procurement Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-483, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8645).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement of Natural Gas and Electricity Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-520, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9115).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Library Procurement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-661, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1114).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of DCPL Procurement Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-93, May 20, 2009, 56 DCR 4311).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Boys and Girls Club of Greater Washington Property Acquisition Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-130, July 6, 2009, 56 DCR 5510).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of DCPL Procurement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-151, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6338).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of University of the District of Columbia Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-200, October 10, 2009, 56 DCR 8137).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2082(d), 4042 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1313, 2082(d), 4042 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of University of the District of Columbia Procurement Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-467, July 7, 2010, 57 DCR 6914).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum and Contracting Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-542, October 9, 2010, 57 DCR 9627).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of University of the District of Columbia Board of Trustees Quorum and Contracting Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-661, December 30, 2010, 58 DCR 70).
Short title: Section 1310 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle FF of title I of the act may be cited as the “Boys and Girls Club of Greater Washington Property Acquisition Act of 2009”.

Sunset provision: Section 4 of D.C. Law 16-197 provided: “This act shall expire 2 years after its effective date.”

Section 19 of D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction made to this section after its repeal.